Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1412
Give to Enable Support Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Give to Enable Support Cash Fund. The fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall accept contributions from any private individual or private entity and shall credit all such contributions received to the Give to Enable Support Cash Fund for the purpose of providing an ongoing source of funding for the program. No General Funds shall be transferred to the Give to Enable Support Cash Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB391, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.